Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3205
Seizure action plan; student; permission granted.

If specified in a student's seizure action plan, such student shall be permitted to possess the supplies, equipment, and medication necessary to treat a seizure disorder in accordance with such seizure action plan.

Laws 2021, LB639, § 5.